North Carolina, session 2025, HB9.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 14-409.47 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-409.47. Application of Article.Preemption.
Except as otherwise provided in this Article, this Article does not prohibit a local government
governments are preempted from regulating the location and construction of a sport shooting
range after September 1, 1997.ranges."
SECTION 2. G.S. 153A-129(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Except as provided in this section, a county may by ordinance regulate, restrict, or
prohibit the discharge of firearms at any time or place except in any of the following instances:
(1) When used to take birds or animals pursuant to Chapter 113, Subchapter IV.
(2) When used in defense of person or property.
(3) When used pursuant to lawful directions of law-enforcement officers.
(4) When used on or within private property with the permission of the owner or
possessor of that property and conducted with reasonable care to prevent a
projectile from crossing the bounds of the property."
SECTION 3. G.S. 160A-189 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160A-189. Firearms.
A city may by ordinance regulate, restrict, or prohibit the discharge of firearms at any time
or place within the city except when used (i) in defense of person or property or pursuant to
lawful directions of law-enforcement officers, and officers or (ii) on or within private property
with the permission of the owner or possessor of that property and conducted with reasonable
care to prevent a projectile from crossing the bounds of the property. A city may by ordinance
regulate the display of firearms on the streets, sidewalks, alleys, or other public property. Nothing
in this section shall be construed to limit a city's authority to take action under Article 1A of
Chapter 166A of the General Statutes."
SECTION 4. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to existing
municipal or county ordinances. Any municipal or county ordinance inconsistent with this act is
void and unenforceable.
*H9-v-1*